Idaho statutes. Title 3 ATTORNEYS AND COUNSELORS AT LAW
Chapter 1
ADMISSION TO PRACTICE

Section.

§ 3-101. Persons entitled to admission.

Any individual who is of the age of majority, of good moral character, and who possesses the necessary qualifications of learning and ability may, under such rules as the Supreme Court may prescribe, be admitted as an attorney and counselor in all courts of this state.

§ 3-102. Oath.

Every person, before receiving license to practice law, shall take the oath prescribed by law.

§ 3-103. Roll of attorneys.

The clerk of the Supreme Court must keep a roll of attorneys and counselors admitted to practice by the court, which roll must be signed by the person admitted before he receives a license.

§ 3-104. Practicing without license a contempt — Exception.

If any person shall practice law or hold himself out as qualified to practice law in this state without having been admitted to practice therein by the Supreme Court and without having paid all license fees now or hereafter prescribed by law for the practice of law he is guilty of contempt both in the Supreme Court and district court for the district in which he shall so practice or hold himself out as qualified to practice. Provided, that any person may appear and act in a magistrate’s division of a district court as representative of any party to a proceeding therein so long as the claim does not total more than $300, and so long as he or his employer has no pecuniary interest in the outcome of the litigation, and that he shall do so without making a charge or collecting a fee therefor.

Former Judges.

Ex-probate judge who advised clients in probate matters and prepared legal documents for compensation was guilty of illegally practicing law. In re Brainard, 55 Idaho 153, 39 P.2d 769 (1924).

Former Judges.

Ex-probate judge who advised clients in probate matters and prepared legal documents for compensation was guilty of illegally practicing law. In re Brainard, 55 Idaho 153, 39 P.2d 769 (1924).

§ 3-105. Right to take examination for admission. [Repealed.]